Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 7. Education; State Institutions; Promotion of Health and Morals; Public Buildings

Public Schools and School Funds

§ 1. Legislature to provide for public schools.

The legislature shall provide for the establishment and maintenance of a complete and uniform system of public instruction, embracing free elementary schools of every needed kind and grade, a university with such technical and professional departments as the public good may require and the means of the state allow, and such other institutions as may be necessary.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning education, see art. 1, § 23, and art. 21, § 28, Wyo. Const., and title 21.

Tax equalization provision unconstitutional. —

Section 21-13-310(c), which prior to its 1985 amendment, mandated the withholding of earned funds under the state school finance system if a county elected official, the county assessor, and the state appointed officials, the state board of equalization, failed to achieve a constitutionally and statutorily mandated tax equalization, was unconstitutional. The right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth, in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Legislature has complete control of state's school system in every respect,

including division of the state into school districts and providing for their financing. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Delegation of legislative function held valid. —

While establishment of school districts and changes therein is a legislative function under this section, legislative delegation of such duty to district boundary boards in each county has been held valid. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Byron Sch. Dist., 37 Wyo. 259, 260 P. 537,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1927).

“Such other institutions as may be necessary” includes community colleges. —

In giving consideration to the various categories of schools referred to in this section, it is entirely clear that community colleges can only come under the category of “such other institutions as may be necessary.” Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

Agricultural college. —

The legislature could repeal an act establishing the agricultural college, which was located by a vote of the people. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

A high school is a component part of a school district.

Erickson v. School Dist., 67 Wyo. 216, 217 P.2d 887,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1950).

School bond elections. —

Statute requiring payment of realty tax as a qualification to vote at a school bond election was invalid. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than one-fourth of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of
Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

School district is not authorized to adopt four-day school week,

resulting in a 144-day school year. Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988); Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Jan 28, 2014).

Cited

in

Gale v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 384, 54 P.2d 811,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1936); Laramie County Sch. Dist. Number One v. Muir, 808 P.2d 797,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1991); RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

For case note, “EDUCATIONAL LAW — Wyoming Refuses to Recognize Compensatory Education as a Remedy Under the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975. Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 529 (1989).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public schools, 60 ALR4th 15.

§ 2. School revenues.

The following are declared to be perpetual funds for school purposes, of which the annual income only can be appropriated, to wit: Such per centum as has been or may hereafter be granted by congress on the sale of lands in this state; all moneys arising from the sale or lease of sections number sixteen and thirty-six in each township in the state, and the lands selected or that may be selected in lieu thereof; the proceeds of all lands that have been or may hereafter be granted to this state, where by the terms and conditions of the grant, the same are not to be otherwise appropriated; the net proceeds of lands and other property and effects that may come to the state by escheat or forfeiture, or from unclaimed dividends or distributive shares of the estates of deceased persons; all moneys, stocks, bonds, lands and other property now belonging to the common school funds. Provided, that the rents for the ordinary use of said lands shall be applied to the support of public schools and, when authorized by general law, not to exceed thirty-three and one-third (33 1/3) per centum of oil, gas, coal, or other mineral royalties arising from the lease of any said school lands may be so applied. (As amended by Laws 1923, Senate Joint Resolution No. 7, p. 225.)

Cross references. —

As to state tax to support schools, see art. 15, § 15, Wyo. Const.

For provision that unexpended income or interest shall be added to and become part of perpetual school fund, see art. 18, § 6, Wyo. Const.

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than one-fourth of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of
Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Bequests to state. —

Where property is bequeathed to the state with an annual income payable to a legatee out of income, the property cannot be considered “not otherwise appropriated” and must be added to the common school fund. Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

Contract with an expert to investigate leases of state lands

and ascertain if correct accounting was being made, and if not, to assist in recovering amount due state, on contingent basis, is not violative of constitution as depleting school funds, as moneys so recovered are a new fund brought into existence through the investigation. Bourne v. Cole, 53 Wyo. 31, 77 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1938).

Supreme court's duty. —

It is bounden duty of supreme court, insofar as possible, to carry provisions that permanent school funds shall remain forever inviolate and undiminished into force and effect. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Quoted

in

Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1952); Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Procedural issues concerning public school funding cases, 115 ALR5th 563.

§ 3. Other sources of school revenues.

To the sources of revenue above mentioned shall be added all other grants, gifts and devises that have been or may hereafter be made to this state and not otherwise appropriated by the terms of the grant, gift or devise.

Bequests to state. —

Where property is bequeathed to the state with an annual income payable to a legatee out of income, the property cannot be considered “not otherwise appropriated” and must be added to the common school fund. Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

In re Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850 (1893).

§ 4. Restriction in use of revenues.

All money, stocks, bonds, lands and other property belonging to a county school fund, except such moneys and property as may be provided by law for current use in aid of public schools, shall belong to and be invested by the several counties as a county public school fund, in such manner as the legislature shall by law provide, the income of which shall be appropriated exclusively to the use and support of free public schools in the several counties of the state. (As amended by Laws 1969, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 494.)

Taxing district responsibility. —

It is competent for the state to make taxing district responsible as principal debtor for its quota of state tax assessed within it. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

§ 5. Fines and penalties to belong to public school fund.

All fines and penalties under general laws of the state shall belong to the public school fund of the respective counties and be paid over to the custodians of such funds for the current support of the public schools therein.

Quoted

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Wyoming Disct. Corp. v. Lamar, 444 P.2d 620,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1898).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 6. State to keep school funds; investment.

All funds belonging to the state for public school purposes, the interest and income of which only are to be used, shall be deemed trust funds in the care of the state, which shall keep them for the exclusive benefit of the public schools. The legislature shall provide by law for the investment of such trust funds. (As amended by Laws 1915, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 264; Laws 1969, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 492.)

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than 1/4 of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

A high school is a component part of a school district.

Erickson v. School Dist., 67 Wyo. 216, 217 P.2d 887,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1950).

Contract with an expert to investigate leases of state lands

and ascertain if correct accounting was being made, and if not, to assist in recovering amount due state, on contingent basis, is not violative of constitution as depleting school funds, as moneys so recovered are a new fund brought into existence through the investigation. Bourne v. Cole, 53 Wyo. 31, 77 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1938).

Unauthorized contract. —

Contract whereby land commissioners authorized auditing company to investigate debts due state under mineral leases was void as delegating discretionary power. MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1935).

Supreme court's duty. —

It is bounden duty of supreme court, insofar as possible, to carry provisions that permanent school funds shall remain forever inviolate and undiminished into force and effect. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Quoted

in

Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1952).

§ 7. Application of school funds.

The income arising from the funds mentioned in the preceding section, together with all the rents of the unsold school lands and such other means as the legislature may provide, shall be exclusively applied to the support of free schools in every county in the state.

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than 1/4 of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Bequests to state. —

Where property is bequeathed to the state with an annual income payable to a legatee out of income, the property cannot be considered “not otherwise appropriated” and must be added to the common school fund. Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

Quoted

in

Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1898); Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1952).

§ 8. Distribution of school funds.

Provision shall be made by general law for the equitable allocation of such income among all school districts in the state. But no appropriation shall be made from said fund to any district for the year in which a school has not been maintained for at least three (3) months; nor shall any portion of any public school fund ever be used to support or assist any private school, or any school, academy, seminary, college or other institution of learning controlled by any church or sectarian organization or religious denomination whatsoever. (As amended by Laws 1978, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 429.)

Cross references. —

As to distribution to school districts, see §

21-13-301

.

As to distribution of funds from foundation program account, see §

21-13-313

.

School bond elections. —

An act requiring payment of tax as a qualification to vote on the question of a school bond issue is unconstitutional. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Quoted

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of regulation or policy governing prayer, meditation, or “moment of silence” in public schools, 110 ALR Fed 211.

Bible distribution or use in public schools — modern cases, 111 ALR Fed 121.

§ 9. Taxation for schools.

The legislature shall make such further provision by taxation or otherwise, as with the income arising from the general school fund will create and maintain a thorough and efficient system of public schools, adequate to the proper instruction of all youth of the state, between the ages of six and twenty-one years, free of charge; and in view of such provision so made, the legislature shall require that every child of sufficient physical and mental ability shall attend a public school during the period between six and eighteen years for a time equivalent to three years, unless educated by other means.

Cross references. —

As to state tax to support schools, see also art. 15, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to maximum rate of school district tax, see §

21-13-102

.

As to levy, collection and distribution of school tax, see §

21-13-201

.

As to levy of state tax for support of public elementary and secondary schools, see §

21-13-303

.

As to tax for support of community college, see §

21-18-205

.

Education for children of state is matter of fundamental interest.

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Pre-school funding not required. —

State is required to provide a thorough and effective system of public schools for all youths between the ages of six and 21, but the constitution does not require the state to provide the necessary funds for each school district to offer voluntary pre-school education.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

No educational services past age 21. —

A county school district is neither entitled nor obligated to provide educational services for individuals within the district after a recipient reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Right to education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth. —

Although the quality of a child's education in the state, measured in terms of dollars available for that purpose, is dependent upon the property tax resources of his school district, the right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Right can be conditioned on conduct. —

Where two students were expelled for one year for selling marijuana, the state constitution did not require that the school district had to provide them with an alternate education because they had been lawfully expelled, the district's actions were the least onerous means of accomplishing its compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of its students, and the students had not been denied all educational opportunity as they could have chosen to return to school after their suspensions. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

Distribution of public school funds based upon wealth is suspect classification. —

Funding a public school system where money is distributed upon the basis of wealth or lack thereof is in a suspect classification, requiring the court's strict scrutiny test to determine if it is achieving a compelling state interest. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Although no requirement of absolute equality in funding. —

Each school district need not receive exactly the same number of dollars per pupil as every other school district because exact or absolute equality is not required. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Tax equalization provision unconstitutional. —

Section 21-13-310(c), which prior to its 1985 amendment, mandated the withholding of earned funds under the state school finance system if a county elected official, the county assessor, and the state appointed officials, the state board of equalization, failed to achieve a constitutionally and statutorily mandated tax equalization, was unconstitutional. The right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth, in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

A high school is a component part of a school district.

Erickson v. School Dist., 67 Wyo. 216, 217 P.2d 887,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1950).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. R.R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1947).

§ 10. No discrimination between pupils.

In none of the public schools so established and maintained shall distinction or discrimination be made on account of sex, race or color.

Cross references. —

For equivalent statutory provision, see §

21-4-303

.

Nature of section. —

This is a special state constitutional provision pertaining to schools and does not fall under any general constitutional provision, such as the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States, which is directed toward the equal protection of the laws, and under which the many school segregation cases are laid. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

“Distinction” contained in this section must be given its ordinary meaning:

“seeming to distinguish,” “setting apart from others,” “individualizing,” “characteristic,” “peculiar,” “special.” Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

No distinctive school may be established for Indians

by an agency of the state of Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public schools, 60 ALR4th 15.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in actions relating to school desegregation, 75 ALR Fed 231.

Validity and construction of public school regulation of student distribution of religious documents at school, 136 ALR Fed 551.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — nonemployment cases 152 ALR Fed 1.

Sex discrimination in public education under Title IX — Supreme Court cases, 158 ALR Fed 563.

§ 11. Textbooks.

Neither the legislature nor the superintendent of public instruction shall have power to prescribe text books to be used in the public schools.

Cross references. —

For provision that schools shall adhere to minimum standards promulgated by state board of education, see §

21-9-101

.

As to free textbooks and supplies, see §§

21-9-201

to

21-9-203

.

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 12. Sectarianism prohibited.

No sectarian instruction, qualifications or tests shall be imparted, exacted, applied or in any manner tolerated in the schools of any grade or character controlled by the state, nor shall attendance be required at any religious service therein, nor shall any sectarian tenets or doctrines be taught or favored in any public school or institution that may be established under this constitution.

Cross references. —

As to religious liberty, see art. 1, § 18, and art. 21, § 25, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting use of school funds to assist educational institution controlled by church or sectarian organization, see art. 7, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Applied

in

Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Williams v. Eaton, 333 F. Supp. 107, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11210 (D. Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of public school regulation of student distribution of religious documents at school, 136 ALR Fed 551.

§ 13. Land commissioners. [Superseded.]

Section superseded. —

This section has been superseded by art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const., as amended in 1922.

§ 14. Supervision of schools entrusted to state superintendent of public instruction.

The general supervision of the public schools shall be entrusted to the state superintendent of public instruction, whose powers and duties shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to duties of superintendent of public instruction, see §§

21-2-201

and

21-2-202

.

Legislature has complete control of state's school system in every respect,

including division of the state into school districts and providing for their financing. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Power of general supervision. —

Phrase “shall be prescribed by law,” as set forth in this provision, does not provide the legislature with unrestricted power to eliminate or transfer powers and duties of the office of State Superintendent of Public Instruction. While the legislature can prescribe powers and duties of the Superintendent, it cannot eliminate or transfer powers and duties to such an extent that the Superintendent no longer maintains the power of general supervision of the public schools.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

There is no need to ascertain the “characteristic common law duties” of the office of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction because Wyoming's constitutional framers expressly entrusted the power of “general supervision of the public schools” to the Superintendent.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Legislature may not delegate powers and duties to other entities to such an extent that the power of general supervision of the public schools no longer resides with the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Laws 2013, Chapter 1 unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1) is unconstitutional, as it
deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of “general supervision of the public schools” that is entrusted to the Superintendent.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Although Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1) does not “eliminate” the office of State Superintendent of Public Instruction, it has effectively marginalized the office and has left it an empty shell. The legislature has attempted to accomplish through legislation what it may only do through the constitutional amendment process; therefore, the act is unconstitutional.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than one-fourth of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of
Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

The University

§ 15. Establishment of university confirmed.

The establishment of the University of Wyoming is hereby confirmed, and said institution, with its several departments, is hereby declared to be the University of the State of Wyoming. All lands which have been heretofore granted or which may be granted hereafter by congress unto the university as such, or in aid of the instruction to be given in any of its departments, with all other grants, donations, or devises for said university, or for any of its departments, shall vest in said university, and be exclusively used for the purposes for which they were granted, donated or devised. The said lands may be leased on terms approved by the land commissioners, but may not be sold on terms not approved by congress.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning the university of Wyoming, see §§

21-17-101

to

21-17-450

.

Agricultural college. —

The legislature can repeal an act establishing an agricultural college, which was located by a vote of the people. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university

lies in state board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights-of-way. —

The legislature is not prohibited from authorizing board of land commissioners to grant right-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Use of permanent land fund. —

University permanent land fund was not intended to be confined to use in paying current expenses, but may, if necessary and proper, be used for erection of buildings when authorized by the legislature. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

Quoted

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 16. Tuition free.

The university shall be equally open to students of both sexes, irrespective of race or color; and, in order that the instruction furnished may be as nearly free as possible, any amount in addition to the income from its grants of lands and other sources above mentioned, necessary to its support and maintenance in a condition of full efficiency shall be raised by taxation or otherwise, under provisions of the legislature.

Cross references. —

For equivalent statutory provision, see §

21-17-105

.

Quoted

in

Biscar v. University of Wyo. Bd. of Trustees, 605 P.2d 374,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1898); State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906); Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1924); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 17. Government of university.

The legislature
shall provide by law for the management of the university, its lands
and other property by a board of trustees, consisting of not less
than seven members, to be appointed by the governor by and with the
advice and consent of the senate, and the president of the university,
and the superintendent of public instruction, as members ex officio,
as such having the right to speak, but not to vote. The duties and
powers of the trustees shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to board of trustees of university, see §§

21-17-201

to

21-17-206

.

Editor's Note. —

2013 Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No.1, proposes to amend the
Wyoming Constitution to remove the requirement that a person be a resident
of the state of Wyoming to serve as a trustee of the University of
Wyoming and limiting the number of nonresidents who may serve as trustees.
Sections 1 and 2 state as follows: Section 1. The following proposal
to amend
Wyoming Constitution, Article 7, Section 17 is proposed for
submission to the electors of the State of Wyoming at the next general
election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the
Constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors at the election:
Article 7, Section 17. Government of university. The legislature shall
provide by law for the management ofthe university, its lands and
other property by a board of trustees, consisting of not less than
seven members, to be appointed by the governor by and with the advice
and consent of the senate, and the president of the university, and
the superintendent of public instruction, as members ex officio, as
such having the right to speak, but not to vote. The duties and powers
of the trustees shall be prescribed by law. Not more than twenty percent
(20%) of the appointed trustees may be nonresidents of the state,
notwithstanding the provisions of Article 6, Section 15 of this Constitution.
Section 2. That the Secretary of State shall endorse the following
statement on the proposed amendment: The adoption of this amendment
would allow the governor to appoint nonresidents of the state to serve
as University of Wyoming trustees. Not more than twenty percent (20%)
of the appointed trustees may be nonresidents of the state. The governor
would not be required to appoint any nonresident as a trustee. All
appointments to the board of trustees are with the advice and consent
of the Wyoming Senate.

Powers of board of land commissioners. —

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university lies in state board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Legislature is not prohibited from authorizing board of land commissioners to grant right-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Trustees have no power to dispose of university lands.

Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Suit against the trustees of the university

is a suit against the state. Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1924).

Quoted

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906).

Charitable and Penal Institutions

§ 18. Establishment of institutions.

Such charitable, reformatory and penal institutions as the claims of humanity and the public good may require, shall be established and supported by the state in such manner as the legislature may prescribe. They shall be supervised as prescribed by law. (As amended by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 770.)

Cross references. —

As to conduct of jails, see art. 1, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to the creation and duties of the department of corrections, see §

25-1-104

.

As to state penal institutions generally, see §§

25-2-101

to

25-4-103

.

Editor's notes. —

The catchline for this section was changed to reflect the amendment by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 770.

Wyoming state hospital is an agency of the state

created by statute at the mandate of the state constitution. Carbon County Sch. Dist. v. Wyoming State Hosp., 680 P.2d 773,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1984).

Appropriations for institutions mentioned herein are constitutional.

State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Transfer of prisoner. —

Transfer of prisoner from industrial institute to state penitentiary is an “executive act,” though board of charities and reform may be required incidentally to determine questions of fact, while sentence of prisoner to the institute is a “judicial act.” Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For casenote, “Constitutional Law — Freedom of Speech: Public Employee — Can We Talk? The Wyoming Supreme Court Grants Little Protection to Public-Employee Whistleblowers. Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 625 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability of prison or jail authorities for self-inflicted injury or death of prisoner, 79 ALR3d 1210.